Maine, session 132, LD1104.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 25 MRSA §2017 is enacted to read:
§2017. Limitation of liability of holder of firearm under firearm hold agreement
A cause of action may not be taken against a person who agreed to hold a firearm under
a firearm hold agreement for returning the firearm to the firearm owner at the termination
of the agreement. The immunity provided in this section does not apply to otherwise
unlawful conduct of the person returning the firearm to the firearm owner under this
section. For purposes of this section, "firearm hold agreement" means a written or oral
agreement between a firearm owner and another person in which the person at the owner's
request takes physical possession of a firearm lawfully possessed by the owner and holds
the firearm for an agreed-upon period of time.